Connecticut, session 2026, SB00258.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Insurance Commissioner shall
2 conduct a study concerning issues relating to property and casualty
3 insurance in the state. Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner
4 shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
5 of the general statutes, concerning the results of such study to the joint
6 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
7 matters relating to insurance.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
"Department" was changed to "Commissioner" for adherence to
standard drafting conventions.
INS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB258 / File No. 219 1

sSB258 File No. 219
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Insurance Department to study issues relating to
property and casualty insurance and results in no fiscal impact as the
department has the expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
sSB258 / File No. 219 2

sSB258 File No. 219
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 258
AN ACT CONCERNING PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE.